Wyoming, session 2025, HB0311.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105(a)(iii)(E) is amended to
read:
39-15-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:
(iii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property consumed in
production, the following are exempt:
(E) Sales of power or fuel to a person
transporting tangible personal property by railroad or by
pipeline when the power or fuel is consumed directly in
generating motive power for actual transportation purposes,
regardless of ownership of the transported tangible
personal property, except power or fuel which is not taxed
as gasoline or gasohol under W.S. 39-17-101 through
39-17-111 or as diesel fuel under W.S. 39-17-201 through
39-17-211 and which is used to propel a motor vehicle upon
the highway as defined in W.S. 39-17-201(a)(xii). As used
in this subparagraph, "pipeline" means a system of
connected pipes and other equipment that is used to
transport oil, natural gas or other hydrocarbons from a
well site to an interstate or intrastate transmission
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0311
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
customer sales delivery point, including between
intermediate points along a transportation path;
Section 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0311
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3